hu_HU.aff
SFX p Y 209
SFX p   ztik szük         sztik
SFX p   ztik szük         sztik
SFX p   ztik szétek       sztik
SFX p   ztik szétek       sztik
SFX p   ztik szék         sztik
SFX p   ztik szék         sztik
SFX p   zt   szük         szt
SFX p   zt   szétek       szt
SFX p   zt   szék         szt
SFX p   zt   szem         szt
SFX p   zt   szelek       szt
SFX p   zt   szed         szt
SFX p   zt   sze          szt
SFX p   zik  szük         szik
SFX p   zik  szük         szik
SFX p   zik  szétek       szik
SFX p   zik  szék         szik
SFX p   zik  szék         szik
SFX p   zik  szelek       szik
SFX p   zik  szed         szik
SFX p   zik  sze          szik
SFX p   zik  dzük         dzik
SFX p   zik  dzük         dzik
SFX p   zik  dzétek       dzik
SFX p   zik  dzék         dzik
SFX p   zik  dzék         dzik
SFX p   zik  dzlek        dzik
SFX p   zik  dze          dzik
SFX p   zik  dzd          dzik
SFX p   z    szük         sz
SFX p   z    szék         sz
SFX p   z    szem         sz
SFX p   z    szelek       sz
SFX p   z    szed         sz
SFX p   z    sze          sz
SFX p   z    dzük         dz
SFX p   z    dzék         dz
SFX p   z    dzem         dz
SFX p   z    dzelek       dz
SFX p   z    dzed         dz
SFX p   z    dze          dz
SFX p   tik  ssük         [aeiosuöü]tik
SFX p   tik  ssétek       [aeiosuöü]tik
SFX p   tik  ssék         [aeiosuöü]tik
SFX p   t    ssük         [aeiosuöü]t
SFX p   t    ssétek       [aeiosuöü]t
SFX p   t    ssék         [aeiosuöü]t
SFX p   t    ssem         [aeiosuöü]t
SFX p   t    sselek       [aeiosuöü]t
SFX p   t    ssed         [aeiosuöü]t
SFX p   t    sse          [aeiosuöü]t
SFX p   t    sd           [aeiosuöü]t
SFX p   t    d            szt
SFX p   ik   öd           ik
SFX p   ik   zük          [^ds]zik
SFX p   ik   zük          [^ds]zik
SFX p   ik   zétek        [^ds]zik
SFX p   ik   zétek        [^ds]zik
SFX p   ik   zék          [^ds]zik
SFX p   ik   zék          [^ds]zik
SFX p   ik   zelek        [^s]zik
SFX p   ik   zelek        [^ds]zik
SFX p   ik   zed          [^s]zik
SFX p   ik   zed          [^ds]zik
SFX p   ik   ze           [^ds]zik
SFX p   ik   tük          ik
SFX p   ik   tétek        ik
SFX p   ik   ték          ik
SFX p   ik   telek        ik
SFX p   ik   ted          ik
SFX p   ik   te           ik
SFX p   ik   sük          sik
SFX p   ik   sük          sik
SFX p   ik   sük          [^aeiosuzöü]tik
SFX p   ik   sétek        sik
SFX p   ik   sétek        sik
SFX p   ik   sétek        [^aeiosuzöü]tik
SFX p   ik   sék          sik
SFX p   ik   sék          sik
SFX p   ik   sék          [^aeiosuzöü]tik
SFX p   ik   selek        sik
SFX p   ik   sed          sik
SFX p   ik   se           sik
SFX p   ik   ném          .ik
SFX p   ik   nélek        .ik
SFX p   ik   nék          .ik
SFX p   ik   néd          .ik
SFX p   ik   né           .ik
SFX p   ik   lek          szik
SFX p   ik   lek          [^dlrz]ik
SFX p   ik   lek          [^bdgjkmrstyz][dlrz]ik
SFX p   ik   jük          [^stz]ik
SFX p   ik   jük          [^stz]ik
SFX p   ik   jétek        [^stz]ik
SFX p   ik   jétek        [^stz]ik
SFX p   ik   jék          [^stz]ik
SFX p   ik   jék          [^stz]ik
SFX p   ik   jelek        [^stz]ik
SFX p   ik   jed          [^stz]ik
SFX p   ik   je           [^stz]ik
SFX p   ik   i            ik
SFX p   ik   elek         s[dl]ik
SFX p   ik   elek         [bdgj-nrtyz][dglrz]ik
SFX p   ik   d            szik
SFX p   ik   d            [^t]ik
SFX p   0    öttük        [lnrz]d
SFX p   0    öttük        [ln]l
SFX p   0    öttük        [ijlnrsuzáéíóöûü]t
SFX p   0    öttük        [gn]g
SFX p   0    öttétek      [lnrz]d
SFX p   0    öttétek      [ln]l
SFX p   0    öttétek      [ijlnrsuzáéíóöûü]t
SFX p   0    öttétek      [gn]g
SFX p   0    ötték        [lnrz]d
SFX p   0    ötték        [ln]l
SFX p   0    ötték        [ijlnrsuzáéíóöûü]t
SFX p   0    ötték        [gn]g
SFX p   0    ötted        [lnrz]d
SFX p   0    ötted        [ln]l
SFX p   0    ötted        [ijlnrsuzáéíóöûü]t
SFX p   0    ötte         [lnrz]d
SFX p   0    ötte         [ln]l
SFX p   0    ötte         [ijlnrsuzáéíóöûü]t
SFX p   0    öm           [^k]
SFX p   0    öd           [^k]
SFX p   0    zük          z
SFX p   0    zük          [^ds]z
SFX p   0    zétek        [^ds]z
SFX p   0    zék          [^ds]z
SFX p   0    zem          [^ds]z
SFX p   0    zelek        [^ds]z
SFX p   0    zed          [^s]z
SFX p   0    ze           [^ds]z
SFX p   0    tük          [^tóõúû]
SFX p   0    tük          [^ijlnrsuzáéíóöûü]t
SFX p   0    tétek        [^kt]
SFX p   0    tétek        [^ijlnrsuzáéíóöûü]t
SFX p   0    ték          [^kt]
SFX p   0    ték          [^ijlnrsuzáéíóöûü]t
SFX p   0    telek        [^tóõúû]
SFX p   0    telek        [^ijlnrsuzáéíóöûü]t
SFX p   0    ted          [^kt]
SFX p   0    ted          [^ijlnrsuzáéíóöûü]t
SFX p   0    te           [^kt]
SFX p   0    te           [^ijlnrsuzáéíóöûü]t
SFX p   0    sük          s
SFX p   0    sük          s
SFX p   0    sük          [^aeiosuzöü]t
SFX p   0    sétek        s
SFX p   0    sétek        [^aeiosuzöü]t
SFX p   0    sék          s
SFX p   0    sék          [^aeiosuzöü]t
SFX p   0    sem          s
SFX p   0    sem          [^aeiosuzöü]t
SFX p   0    selek        s
SFX p   0    selek        [^aeiosuzöü]t
SFX p   0    sed          s
SFX p   0    sed          [^aeiosuzöü]t
SFX p   0    se           s
SFX p   0    se           [^aeiosuzöü]t
SFX p   0    sd           [^aeiosuzöü]t
SFX p   0    ném          [aeiouöü]t
SFX p   0    ném          [^kt]
SFX p   0    nélek        [aeiouöü]t
SFX p   0    nélek        [^kt]
SFX p   0    nék          [aeiouöü]t
SFX p   0    nék          [^kt]
SFX p   0    néd          [aeiouöü]t
SFX p   0    néd          [^kt]
SFX p   0    né           [aeiouöü]t
SFX p   0    né           [^kt]
SFX p   0    lek          [^l]l
SFX p   0    lek          [^kl]
SFX p   0    jük          [^ksz]
SFX p   0    jük          [^kstz]
SFX p   0    jétek        [^kstz]
SFX p   0    jék          [^kstz]
SFX p   0    jem          [^kstz]
SFX p   0    jelek        [^kstz]
SFX p   0    jed          [^kstz]
SFX p   0    je           [^kstz]
SFX p   0    itek         [^k]
SFX p   0    ik           [^k]
SFX p   0    i            [^k]
SFX p   0    eném         [lnrz]d
SFX p   0    eném         [ln]l
SFX p   0    eném         [jlnrszáéíû]t
SFX p   0    eném         [gn]g
SFX p   0    enélek       [lnrz]d
SFX p   0    enélek       [ln]l
SFX p   0    enélek       [jlnrszáéíû]t
SFX p   0    enélek       [gn]g
SFX p   0    enék         [lnrz]d
SFX p   0    enék         [ln]l
SFX p   0    enék         [jlnrszáéíû]t
SFX p   0    enék         [gn]g
SFX p   0    enéd         [lnrz]d
SFX p   0    enéd         [ln]l
SFX p   0    enéd         [jlnrszáéíû]t
SFX p   0    enéd         [gn]g
SFX p   0    ené          [lnrz]d
SFX p   0    ené          [ln]l
SFX p   0    ené          [jlnrszáéíû]t
SFX p   0    ené          [gn]g
SFX p   0    elek         [lnrz]d
SFX p   0    elek         [jlnrszáéíû]t
SFX p   0    elek         [gn]g
SFX p   0    d            [dz]
SFX p   0    d            [^t]
