hu_HU.dic
üvöltözik/PpX
üvölt/PpX
üt/PpX
üldöz/PpX
ül/PpX
üdvözöl/dXPpdX
ûz/PpX
ötvözõdik/PpX
ötvöz/PpX
ösztönöz/PpX
összeötvözõdik/PpX
összegzõdik/PpX
örököl/dXPpdX
önöz/PpX
öntözködik/PpX
öntöz/PpX
önt/PpX
önfejûsködik/PpX
ölõdik/PpX
ölt/PpCDHRW
öldös/PpX
öldököl/PpX
öl/PpBVLNlTYcD
ökörködik/PpX
öklöz/PpX
öblöz/PpX
õröl/dXPpdX
észrevevõdik/PpX
érzõdik/PpX
értesül/PpX
értekezõdik/PpX
élezõdik/PpX
átgörög/PpX
zümmög/PpX
zötyköl/PpX
zörög/dXPpdX
zöcsköl/PpX
zsonglõrködik/PpX
visszaidézõdik/PpX
vetkõzik/PpX
vesszõz/PpX
tükröz/PpX
tûzköd/PpX
tûz/PpXCWYc
tûr/PpX
tötyörög/PpX
törölközik/PpX
töröl/dXPpdX
tör/PpX
tömörödik/PpX
tömköd/PpX
töm/PpX
tölt/PpX
tökölõdik/PpX
töfög/PpX
többszöröz/PpX
tõröz/PpX
trüszköl/PpX
tetõzik/PpX
tetõz/PpX
terhelõdik/PpX
tekerõzik/PpX
süt/PpX
sürgönyöz/dXPpdX
söpör/dXPpdX
szürcsöl/PpX
szül/PpX
szûr/PpXCWMmRTYcD
szûköl/PpX
szöszöl/PpX
szörpöl/PpX
szörnyülködik/PpX
szõröz/PpX
szõhetõ/PpXJX
számûz/PpX
számkiûz/PpX
szellõzködik/PpX
szegül/PpX
stíröl/PpX
seprûz/PpX
rötyög/PpX
röpdös/PpX
rögtönöz/PpX
rálõcsöl/PpX
redõz/PpX
rajtaüt/PpX
püföl/PpX
pörösködik/PpX
pöröl/PpX
pörzsöl/PpX
pörköl/PpX
pödör/dXPpdX
pöcköl/PpX
petyhüdik/PpX
pedzhetõ/PpXJX
pasztõröz/PpX
parfümöz/PpX
nélkülöz/PpX
nyüzsög/dXPpdX
nyüzsgölõdik/PpX
nyüstöl/PpX
nyûvõdik/PpX
nyûhetõ/PpXJX
nyûgöz/PpX
nyög/PpX
mût/PpX
mérsékelõdik/PpX
mennydörög/dXPpdX
menekül/PpX
mellõz/PpX
megöl/Pp
megõrzõdik/PpX
megtörül/PpX
megteremtõdik/PpX
megpecsételõdik/PpX
megkönnyül/PpX
megidézõdik/PpX
megemlítõdik/PpX
megdühösödik/PpX
megdicsõül/PpX
manikûröz/PpX
lúdbõröz/PpX
lúdbõrzik/PpX
lövöldöz/PpX
lötyköl/PpX
lökdös/PpX
lõdöz/PpX
lépcsõz/PpX
légfürdõzik/PpX
leöl/Pp
leértékelõdik/PpX
levezetõdik/PpX
levetkõz/PpX
letörül/PpX
legörög/PpX
legyöngül/PpX
lefékezõdik/PpX
küzd/PpX
küszöböl/PpX
kürtöl/PpX
küldöz/PpX
küld/PpX
közöl/dXPpdX
kötöz/PpX
köt/PpX
köszörül/PpX
köszönt/PpXCDHRWX
köszön/PpX
köröz/dXPpdX
körmöl/PpX
köpül/PpX
köpölyöz/PpX
köpköd/PpX
köp/PpX
könyörül/PpX
könyörög/dXPpdX
könyököl/dXPpdX
költözik/PpX
költ/PpX
kölcsönöz/PpX
köhög/PpX
köcsögösködik/PpX
késõll/PpX
készül/PpX
kiérzõdik/PpX
kiélezõdik/PpX
kitûrõdik/PpX
kisbõgõzik/PpX
kiküszöbölõdik/PpX
kifizetõdik/PpX
kettõz/PpX
keserül/PpX
kerül/PpX
kendõz/PpX
keltezõdik/PpX
jövendöl/PpX
jésül/PpX
jelöl/PpX
idõz/PpX
hût/PpX
hörpöl/PpX
hõmérõz/PpX
hozzátörül/PpX
hengergõzik/PpX
hegedül/PpX
gürcöl/PpX
görcsöl/PpX
göngyöl/PpX
gõzöl/PpX
gõgösködik/PpX
gyûrûz/PpX
gyûrûsödik/PpX
gyûr/PpX
gyûlöl/PpX
gyûjt/PpX
gyötör/dXPpdX
gyöngül/PpX
gyöngyöz/PpX
gyömöszöl/PpX
gyõzködik/PpX
gyõzköd/PpX
gyõz/PpX
gyepûz/PpX
fütyül/PpX
füstöl/PpX
füröszt/PpX
fürtöz/PpX
függönyöz/PpX
fûz/PpXCWYcBVLNlTYcD
fût/PpX
fölöz/PpX
fölidézõdik/PpX
fölhergelõdik/PpX
föd/PpX
fõz/PpX
fésül/PpX
fékezõdik/PpX
fröcsög/PpX
fröcsköl/PpX
feslõdik/PpX
fertõz/PpX
feltûnõsködik/PpX
felingerlõdik/PpX
felidézõdik/PpX
felhergelõdik/PpX
felfüggesztõdik/PpX
felfejtõdik/PpX
felfedõdik/PpX
felemlítõdik/PpX
felcsévélõdik/PpX
feküdik/PpX
ezüstöz/PpX
eszközöl/PpX
ernyõz/PpX
elözönöl/PpX
elöl/PpD
elõz/PpX
elviselõdik/PpX
elszörnyülködik/PpX
elrenyhül/PpX
elrejtõdik/PpX
elnyûvõdik/PpX
elmeddül/PpX
elkeskenyül/PpX
elgyöngül/PpX
elfelejtõdik/PpX
elcsöndesül/PpX
dünnyög/PpX
dût/PpX
dörög/dXPpdX
dörzsöl/PpX
dörmög/PpX
dörgöl/PpX
dönt/PpX
döngöl/PpX
döng/PpX
dömöcköl/PpX
dölyfösködik/PpX
dögönyöz/PpX
döföl/PpX
döfköd/PpX
döf/PpX
cölöpöz/PpX
csücsörödik/PpX
csûr/PpXCWMmRYcD
csörlõz/PpX
csöpörög/PpX
csömöszöl/PpX
csõrözik/PpX
csõröz/PpX
csévélõdik/PpX
csepül/PpX
bütykösödik/PpX
bütyköl/PpX
bûvöl/PpX
börtönöz/PpX
bökdös/PpX
böfög/PpX
bõröz/PpX
bõg/PpX
betûz/PpX
berekesztõdik/PpX
beleöl/Pp
beleértõdik/PpX
belevésõdik/PpX
becsül/PpX
alulbecsül/PpX
